Hawaii, session 2025, HB806.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the widespread use of illegal fireworks poses an extreme danger and lethal risk to public health and safety, resulting in fires, serious burn injuries, and fatalities to innocent bystanders.  The cost to the community far outweighs any intrinsic benefit, as numerous lives have been lost over the years from the use of illegal fireworks.  In addition, the potential for wildfires in this time of climate change is a real and present danger and is a top priority for all levels of government today. The legislature further finds that fireworks-related tragedies, including the Aliamanu New Year's Eve explosion of 2024 that claimed at least six lives, seriously impact entire neighborhoods in urban Honolulu and across the State.  Fireworks also emit excessive smoke and other toxins into the air, making breathing difficult for thousands of Hawaii residents with respiratory ailments.  Noise from loud fireworks traumatizes many residents, particularly war veterans who may suffer from post-traumatic stress from being in combat.  Pets and vulnerable species in their natural habitats also suffer each holiday season when fireworks noise and environmental pollution levels are especially high. The legislature recognizes that, with the increase in fireworks-related calls, public safety agencies are heavily strained to maintain adequate response levels for other critical emergencies, which adds to the cost of state and county resources that could be used for natural disasters and other emergencies. These agencies are often overwhelmed and are not able to stop the thousands of illegal fireworks being used, making it a death trap for thousands of innocent lives who are not involved in illegal fireworks use. The legislature also finds that the State's communities deserve to live in peace and security without the public safety risk and disruptive impact of illegal fireworks.  There can be no more gray areas when lives are lost while this black market flourishes. The legislature believes that intelligence-led policing and criminal surveillance of illegal fireworks can be effective approaches in deterring the use of illegal fireworks.  An investment of funds to conduct sting operations by law enforcement to enforce fireworks ordinances or laws on Oahu is one of the first steps to effectively reducing the use of illegal fireworks in the State. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for the department of law enforcement to conduct sting operations on Oahu to enforce fireworks ordinances or laws. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of law enforcement to conduct sting operations on Oahu to enforce chapter 132D, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of law enforcement for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.